New York, session 2025-2026, S7046.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 711 of the real property actions 2 and proceedings law, as amended by section 4 of part HH of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 2. The tenant has defaulted in the payment of rent, pursuant to the 5 agreement under which the premises are held, and a written demand of the 6 rent has been made with at least [fourteen] seven days' notice requir- 7 ing, in the alternative, the payment of the rent, or the possession of 8 the premises, has been served upon the tenant as prescribed in section 9 seven hundred thirty-five of this article. The [fourteen-day] seven-day 10 notice shall append or contain the notice required pursuant to section 11 two hundred thirty-one-c of the real property law, which shall state the 12 following: (i) if the premises are or are not subject to article six-A 13 of the real property law, the "good cause eviction law", and if the 14 premises are exempt, such notice shall state why the premises are exempt 15 from such law; (ii) if the landlord is not renewing the lease for a unit 16 subject to article six-A of the real property law, the lawful basis for 17 such non-renewal; and (iii) if the landlord is increasing the rent upon 18 an existing lease of a unit subject to article six-A of the real proper- 19 ty law above the applicable local rent standard, as defined in subdivi- 20 sion eight of section two hundred eleven of the real property law, the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11412-01-5 S. 7046 2 1 justification for such increase. Any person succeeding to the landlord's 2 interest in the premises may proceed under this subdivision for rent due 3 such person's predecessor in interest if such person has a right there- 4 to. Where a tenant dies during the term of the lease and rent due has 5 not been paid and the apartment is occupied by a person with a claim to 6 possession, a proceeding may be commenced naming the occupants of the 7 apartment seeking a possessory judgment only as against the estate. 8 Entry of such a judgment shall be without prejudice to the possessory 9 claims of the occupants, and any warrant issued shall not be effective 10 as against the occupants. 11 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 711 of the real property actions and 12 proceedings law, as amended by section 12 of part M of chapter 36 of the 13 laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 14 2. The tenant has defaulted in the payment of rent, pursuant to the 15 agreement under which the premises are held, and a written demand of the 16 rent has been made with at least [fourteen] seven days' notice requir- 17 ing, in the alternative, the payment of the rent, or the possession of 18 the premises, has been served upon [him] the tenant as prescribed in 19 section seven hundred thirty-five of this article. Any person succeeding 20 to the landlord's interest in the premises may proceed under this subdi- 21 vision for rent due [his] such person's predecessor in interest if [he] 22 such person has a right thereto. Where a tenant dies during the term of 23 the lease and rent due has not been paid and the apartment is occupied 24 by a person with a claim to possession, a proceeding may be commenced 25 naming the occupants of the apartment seeking a possessory judgment only 26 as against the estate. Entry of such a judgment shall be without preju- 27 dice to the possessory claims of the occupants, and any warrant issued 28 shall not be effective as against the occupants. 29 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 749 of the real proper- 30 ty actions and proceedings law, as amended by section 19 of part M of 31 chapter 36 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 32 (a) The officer to whom the warrant is directed and delivered shall 33 give at least [fourteen] seven days' notice, in writing and in the 34 manner prescribed in this article for the service of a notice of peti- 35 tion, to the person or persons to be evicted or dispossessed and shall 36 execute the warrant on a business day between the hours of sunrise and 37 sunset. 38 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to actions 39 and proceedings commenced on or after such effective date; provided, 40 however, that section one of this act shall be subject to the expiration 41 and reversion of such subdivision pursuant to section 7 of part HH of 42 chapter 56 of the laws of 2024, as amended, when upon such date the 43 provisions of section two of this act shall take effect.